Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2260.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5113. Civil immigration arrests made on Commonwealth property.(a) Immigration enforcement occurring on Commonwealth property.--A representative of a Federal, State or local law enforcement authority may not detain, arrest or otherwise take a person on Commonwealth property into custody on the basis of immigration enforcement, unless the representative is acting in the representative's official capacity and the representative possesses on their person a judicial warrant that clearly 1234567891011121314151617 demonstrates that the person to be detained, arrested or otherwise taken into custody is the subject of the judicial warrant.(b) Warrant disclosure.--If a representative of a Federal, State or local law enforcement authority is performing an arrest on the basis of immigration enforcement on Commonwealth property, the arresting representative shall provide the necessary documentation under subsection (a) to a Commonwealth employee who requests to review the documentation.(c) Civil penalty.--A person that performs an immigration enforcement arrest without the documentation described under subsection (a), or refuses to disclose the necessary documentation to a requesting Commonwealth employee as described under subsection (b), shall be subject to a civil penalty of $10,000 for each violation. A penalty imposed under this subsection shall be paid to the Commonwealth.(d) Sovereign immunity.--The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 (relating to matters affecting government units) shall not apply to a cause of action brought in accordance with this section against a representative of a Federal, State or local law enforcement authority.(e) Enforcement.--The Attorney General shall institute a proceeding to recover the civil penalty under subsection (c) against any person liable to the Commonwealth for the penalty.(f) Criminal laws.-- Except as provided under subsections (a) and (b), nothing under this act shall preclude the investigation, enforcement or assistance in the investigation or enforcement of Federal or State criminal laws.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20260HB2260PN2957 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth property." The State Capitol Building and grounds, State buildings and grounds in Dauphin County, Pittsburgh State Office Building and grounds, Philadelphia State Office Building and grounds and Scranton State Office Building and grounds."Immigration enforcement." As follows:(1) An effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal civil immigration law.(2) The term includes an effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person's presence in, entry or reentry to or employment in the United States, including a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1253 (relating to penalties related to removal), 1324c (relating to penalties for document fraud), 1325 (relating to improper entry by alien) or 1326 (relating to reentry of removed aliens)."Judicial warrant." A written order, that is signed by a judicial officer, from a Federal Article III court or State court that directs a law enforcement authority or some other person who is specifically named in the order to arrest a person.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2260PN2957 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324